src/morphology/stemparts/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_YKSILÖITY




[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:dy       A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:dy       A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:dy       A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:dy       A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_LENKO




[CMP=POS]:ko        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:go       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:go       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ko        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:go       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:go       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_MELTO




[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:lo       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:lo       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:lo       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:lo       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_PARANNELTU




[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:lu       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:lu       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:lu       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:lu       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_VÄHÄTELTY




[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ly       A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ly       A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ly       A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ly       A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_VENTO




[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:no       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:no       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:to       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:no       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:no       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_PANTU




[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:nu       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:nu       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:nu       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:nu       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_MENTY




[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ny       A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ny       A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ny       A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ny       A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_MARTO




[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ro       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ro       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:to    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ro   A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ro   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_PURTU




[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ru       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ru       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ru       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ru       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_PIERTY




[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ry       A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ry       A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ry       A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ry       A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_HUPAKKO




[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_ABNORMI




[CMP=POS]:i        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:i        A_BACK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:e        A_BACK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:i        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:i        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:e        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;
[CMP=POS]:e        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:i        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:e        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_STYDI




[CMP=POS]:i        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:i        A_FRONT_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:e        A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:i        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:i        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:e        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;
[CMP=POS]:e        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:i        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:e        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_OPAAKKI




[CMP=POS]:ki     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ki     A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ke    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ki     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ki     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:ke     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:k     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ke     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ke   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_PINKKI




[CMP=POS]:ki     A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ki     A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ke    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ki     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ki     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:ke     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:k     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ke     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ke   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SIPPI




[CMP=POS]:pi     A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pi     A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pe    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:pi     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
[CMP=POS]:pi     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:pe    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:p     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pe    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:pe   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HURTTI




[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:t     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:te   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VÄÄRTTI




[CMP=POS]:ti       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ti       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:i       A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:te     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ti       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:te     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:t     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:te     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:te   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TUHTI




[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:di     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:de     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:t     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:di  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:de   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_REHTI




[CMP=POS]:ti     A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:di     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:de     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ti     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:t     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:di  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:de   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_ABNORMAALI

[CMP=POS]:i     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
[CMP=POS]:i     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i     A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e     A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_ÖYKKÄRI




[CMP=POS]:i       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:e     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
